Utah statutes.
4-11-7.   County bee inspector -- Duties -- Diseased apiaries -- Examination
of diseased bees by department -- Election to transport bees to wax-salvage
plant.
(1)  The county bee inspector shall inspect all apiaries within the county at
least once each year and, also, inspect immediately any apiary within the
county which is alleged in a written complaint to be diseased.
(2)  If upon inspection the inspector determines that an apiary is diseased,
the inspector shall take the following action:
(a)  Prescribe the course of treatment that the owner or caretaker of the bees
shall follow to eliminate the disease; or
(b)  Personally, for the purpose of treatment approved by the department, take
control of the diseased bees, hives, combs, broods, honey, and equipment; or
(c)  Destroy the diseased bees and, if necessary, their hives, combs, broods,
honey, and all appliances which may have become infected.
(3)  The owner of an apiary who is dissatisfied with the diagnosis or course
of action proposed by an inspector under this section may, at such owner's
expense, have the department examine the alleged diseased bees. The decision
of the commissioner with respect to the condition of such bees at the time of
the examination is final and conclusive upon the owner and the inspector
involved.
(4)  The owner of a diseased apiary, notwithstanding the provisions of
Subsections (2) and (3) of this section, may elect under the direction of the
county bee inspector to kill the diseased bees, seal their hives, and
transport them to a licensed wax-salvage plant.
